incubator/apertium-ga-gv/apertium-ga-gv.ga.dix
    <pardef n="pu/nt__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nt</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>nt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ú/s__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diamh/air__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aire</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>air</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>air<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="feidearálachas"><par n="initial-f"/><i>eidearálacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aiséiteachas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>iséiteacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="déanmhas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>éanmha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="suntas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>unta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mórtas"><par n="initial-m"/><i>órta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="samhnas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>amhna</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="spalpas"><i>spalpa</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tús"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ú</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aithreachas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>ithreacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="méathras"><par n="initial-m"/><i>éathra</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="féinaitheantas"><par n="initial-f"/><i>éinaitheanta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Tóraíochas"><par n="initial-T"/><i>óraíocha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="molás"><par n="initial-m"/><i>olá</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="siúcrós"><par n="initial-s"/><i>iúcró</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="impiriúlachas"><par n="initial-i"/><i>mpiriúlacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ógras"><par n="initial-Ó"/><i>gra</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="treibheachas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>reibheacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="maighdeanas"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aighdeana</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="luathoideachas"><i>luathoideacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="taobhachas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>aobhacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Marxachas"><par n="initial-M"/><i>arxacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oifigiúlachas"><par n="initial-o"/><i>ifigiúlacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="hiodrant"><i>hiodra</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="siombalachas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>iombalacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="carbhas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>arbha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="athfhás"><par n="initial-a"/><i>thfhá</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Naitseachas"><i>Naitseacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="trupás"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rupá</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="amaitéarachas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>maitéaracha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="briathrachas"><par n="initial-b"/><i>riathracha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="féichiúnas"><par n="initial-f"/><i>éichiúna</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="árachas"><par n="initial-á"/><i>racha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cleithiúnas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>leithiúna</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cearrbhachas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>earrbhacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="eiteachas"><par n="initial-e"/><i>iteacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="iar-nua-aoiseachas"><par n="initial-i"/><i>ar-nua-aoiseacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gramhas"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ramha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="searbhas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>earbha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leifteanant"><i>leifteana</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tomhaltas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>omhalta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Comhaontas"><par n="initial-C"/><i>omhaonta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bráithreachas"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ráithreacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Oireachtas"><par n="initial-O"/><i>ireachta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="géaradas"><par n="initial-g"/><i>éarada</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cránas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rána</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="míshonas"><par n="initial-m"/><i>íshona</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seobhaineachas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eobhaineacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sonas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ona</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="réamheolas"><i>réamheola</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ard-Oideachas"><par n="initial-A"/><i>rd-Oideacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cruas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rua</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ildiachas"><par n="initial-i"/><i>ldiacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="míleatachas"><par n="initial-m"/><i>íleatacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="teaghlachas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>eaghlacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="treallús"><par n="initial-t"/><i>reallú</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="caillteanas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>aillteana</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leathsholas"><i>leathshola</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tútachas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>útacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fiúntas"><par n="initial-f"/><i>iúnta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cannabas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>annaba</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fuarallas"><par n="initial-f"/><i>uaralla</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leictreamaighnéadas"><i>leictreamaighnéada</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cánachas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ánacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rómánsachas"><i>rómánsacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="deitéarmanant"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eitéarmana</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Aontas"><par n="initial-A"/><i>onta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ardcheannas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>rdcheanna</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leanúnachas"><i>leanúnacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="eiseachas"><par n="initial-e"/><i>iseacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="easpónant"><par n="initial-e"/><i>aspóna</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Oráisteachas"><par n="initial-O"/><i>ráisteacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dearbhnialas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>earbhniala</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="eolas"><par n="initial-e"/><i>ola</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sáreolas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>áreola</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="veigeatóireachas"><i>veigeatóireacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tríopas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ríopa</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="idirspleáchas"><par n="initial-i"/><i>dirspleácha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="diamant"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iama</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aireachas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>ireacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="diamhair"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iamh</i><par n="diamh/air__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="taos"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ao</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ollsmachtachas"><par n="initial-o"/><i>llsmachtacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="punt"><par n="initial-p"/><i>u</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aiféaltas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>iféalta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="saineolas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>aineola</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aineolas"><par n="initial-a"/><i>ineola</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fearachas"><par n="initial-f"/><i>earacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="glanspás"><par n="initial-g"/><i>lanspá</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cúnant"><par n="initial-c"/><i>úna</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="finíochas"><par n="initial-f"/><i>iníocha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="miontas"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ionta</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sláinteachas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>láinteacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="seirfeachas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eirfeacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="díshondas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>íshonda</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="suarachas"><par n="initial-s"/><i>uaracha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cliant"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lia</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leathphunt"><i>leathphu</i><par n="pu/nt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gnóisíochas"><par n="initial-g"/><i>nóisíocha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="comharthachas"><par n="initial-c"/><i>omharthacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Ioslamachas"><par n="initial-I"/><i>oslamacha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="diomaíochas"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iomaíocha</i><par n="ú/s__n_m"/></e>
